Louisiana, session 2026, HB112.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 9:355.2 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§355.2. Applicability
A. This Subpart shall apply to an order regarding custody of or visitation
with a child issued:
(1) On or after August 15, 1997.
(2) Before August 15, 1997, if the existing custody order does not expressly
govern the relocation of the child.
B. A. This Subpart shall apply applies to a proposed relocation when any of
the following exist:
(1) There is intent to establish the principal residence of a child at any
location outside the this state.
(2) There is no court order awarding custody and there is an intent to
establish the principal residence of a child at any location within the this state that
is at a distance of more than seventy-five miles from the domicile of the other parent.
(3) There is a court order awarding custody and there is an intent to establish
the principal residence of a child at any location within the this state that is at a
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 112 ENROLLED
distance of more than seventy-five miles from the principal residence of the child at
the time that the most recent custody decree was rendered.
(4) If either no principal residence of a child has been designated by the
court or the parties have equal physical custody, and there is an intent to establish the
principal residence of a child at any location within the this state that is at a distance
of more than seventy-five miles from the domicile of a person entitled to object to
relocation.
C. B. To the extent that this Subpart conflicts with an existing custody order,
this Subpart shall not apply to the terms of that order that govern relocation.
D. C. This Subpart shall not apply when either of the following
circumstances exist:
(1) The persons required to give notice of and the persons entitled to object
to a proposed relocation have entered into an express written agreement for the
relocation of the principal residence of the child.
(2) There is in effect an order issued pursuant to Domestic Abuse Assistance,
R.S. 46:2131, et seq., Protection from Dating Violence, R.S. 46:2151, Part II of
Chapter 28 of Title 46 or the Post-Separation Family Violence Relief Act or
Injunctions and Incidental Orders, Parts IV and V of Chapter 1 of Code Title V of
Code Book I of Title 9, except R.S. 9:372.1, all of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of
1950, Domestic Abuse Assistance, Chapter 8 of Title XV of the Children's Code, or
any other restraining order, preliminary injunction, permanent injunction, or any
protective order prohibiting a person from harming or going near or in the proximity
of the other person. any of the following:
(a) Part II of Chapter 28 of Title 46 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of
1950.
(b) Chapter 28-A of Title 46 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950.
(c) Parts IV and V of Subpart H of Part III of Code Title V of Book I of Title
9 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950, except R.S. 9:372.1.
(d) Chapter 8 of Title XV of the Children's Code.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 112 ENROLLED
(e) Any other protective order prohibiting a person from harming or going
near or in the proximity of the other person.
D. For purposes of this Subpart, miles shall be measured by the shortest
distance that is publicly accessible by motor vehicle or by a public ferry, where
applicable, from the principal residence of a child to the new intended principal
residence.
Section 2. The provisions of this Act shall become effective on January 1, 2027.
Section 3. This Act shall not apply to any litigation pending on the effective date of
this Act regarding the relocation of the principal residence of a child, but shall apply to any
subsequent relocation after final disposition of that litigation.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.